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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DIC2C-02

DTC P0300 | Random/Multiple Cylinder Misfire Detected
DTC P0301 | Cylinder 1 Misfire Detected
DTC P0302 | Cylinder 2 Misfire Detected
DTC P0303 | Cylinder 3 Misfire Detected
DTC P0304 | Cylinder 4 Misfire Detected
DTC P0305 | Cylinder 5 Misfire Detected
DTC P0306 | Cylinder 6 Misfire Detected
DTC P0307 | Cylinder 7 Misfire Detected
DTC P0308 | Cylinder 8 Misfire Detected

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

When a misfire occurs in the engine, hydrocarbons (HC) enter the exhaust in high concentrations. If this HC
concentration is high enough, there could be an increase in exhaust emissions levels. High concentrations
of HC can also cause to temperature of the catalyst to increase, possibly damaging the catalyst. To prevent
this increase in emissions and limit the possibility of thermal damage, the engine control ECU monitors the
misfire rate. When the temperature of the catalyst reaches a point of thermal degradation, the engine control
ECU will blink the MIL. For monitoring misfire, the engine control ECU uses both the camshaft position sen-
sor and the crankshaft position sensor. The camshaft position sensor is used to identify misfiring cylinders
and the crankshaft position sensor is used to measure variations in the crankshatft rotation speed. The mis-
fire counter increments when crankshaft rotation speed variations exceed threshold values.
If the misfiring rate exceeds the threshold value and could cause emissions deterioration, the engine control
ECU illuminates the MIL.
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DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

*Openorshortinengine wire
Misfiring of random cylinders is detected )
P0300 « Connector connection

(2 trip detection logic) ¢ Vacuumhose connection
e lgnition system

P0301 * Injector
P0O302 * Fuelpressure
P0303 * Mass air flow meter
P0304 Misfiring of each cylinderis detected * Engine coolanttemperature sensor
P0305 (2trip detection logic) * Compression pressure
P0306 *Valve clearance
P0307 *Valvetiming
P0308 *PCV p|p|ng
* Engine control ECU
HINT:
Mill blink immediately when catalyst damage level misfire occur.
HINT:

When several codes for a misfiring cylinder are recorded repeatedly but no random misfire code is recorded,
it indicates that the misfires have been detected and recorded at different times.
Reference: Inspection using the oscilloscope.

Withthe engineidling, check the waveform betweenterminals # 1 to#8andEO 1 oftheengine control ECU
connectors.
HINT:
The correct waveform is as shown.
Injector Signal Waveform
(Magnification)
20V I 20V I
/Division + /Division ¥
GND 1 GND =

, 100 msec./Division (Idling) Injection duration 1 msec./Division (Idling) -
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION

Camshaft position sensor

1 >
Engine control
Crankshaft position sensor ECU
(36-2teethor 12teeth)
] >
—
Y A22041

The ECM illuminates the MIL (2 trip detection logic) as follows (DTC is stored after 2 trip detection):
«  Themisfiringrate exceeds athreshold value and could cause emissions deterioration.
«  Anexcessive misfire rate (approximately 20to 60 misfires per 1,000 crankshaft revolutions) occurs
4 times.
The ECM flashes the MIL (MIL flashes immediately) as follows (DTC is stored after 2 trip detection):
«  Within 200 crankshaft revolutions ata high rpm, the threshold for "percent of misfire causing catalyst
damage” is reached once.
«  Within200 crankshaft revolutions ata normal rpm, the threshold for "percent of misfire causing catalyst
damage” is reached 3 times.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0351 on page DI-161 for the wiring diagram of the ignition system.
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

(@) Connectthe hand—held tester to the DLC3.

(b) Record DTC and the freeze frame data.

(c) Use the hand-held tester to set to the check mode (See page DI-3).

(d) Read the value on the misfire counter for each cylinder when idling. If the value is displayed on the
misfire counter, skip the following procedure of confirmation driving.

(e) Drive the vehicle several times with the engine speed, load and its surrounding range shown with EN-
GINE SPD, CALC LOAD inthe freeze frame data or MISFIRE RPM, MISFIRE LOAD in the DATA LIST.

If you have no hand-held tester, turn the ignition switch OFF after the symptom is simulated once. Then re-

peat the simulation process again.

HINT:

In order to memorize the DTC of misfire, it is necessary to drive around MISFIRE RPM, MISFIRE LOAD in

the DATA LIST for the following period of time. Take care not to turn the ignition switch OFF. Turning the

ignition switch OFF switches the diagnosis system from check mode to normal mode. So all DTCs, etc., are

erased.

Engine Speed Time
Idling 3 minutes 30 seconds or more
1,000 rpm 3 minutes or more
2,000 rpm 1 minute 30 seconds or more
3,000 rpm 1 minute or more

()  Checkif there is misfire and DTC and the freeze frame data. Record the DTC's, freeze frame data and
misfire counter data.
(@) Turn the ignition switch OFF and wait at least 5 seconds.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

S If DTCs besides misfire DTCs are memorized simultaneously, troubleshoot the non—misfire DTCs first.

S If the misfire does not occur when the vehicle is brought to the workshop, the misfire can be confirmed
by reproducing the condition of the freeze frame data. Also, after finishing the repair, confirm that there
is no misfire (See confirmation driving pattern).

S On 6 and 8 cylinder engines, misfiring cylinder identification is disabled at high engine speed and only
a general misfire fault code P0300 is stored instead of a cylinder specific misfire fault code (P0301 to
P0308).

If the misfire starts in a high engine speed area or the misfire occurs only in a high engine speed area,
only code P0300 may be stored.

When only a general misfire fault code like PO300 is stored:

Erase the general misfire fault code from the hand-held tester.

Start the engine and drive the confirmation patten.

Read the value of the misfire ratio for each cylinder. Or read the DTC.

Perform repairs on the cylinder that has a high misfire ratio. Or repair the cylinder indicated by the DTC.

After finishing repairs, drive the confirmation pattern again and confirm that no misfire occurs.

When either of SHORT FT #1, LONG FT #1, SHORT FT #2 or LONG FT #2 in the freeze frame data

is over the range of 20 %, there is a possibility that the air—fuel ratio is becoming RICH (-20 % or

less) or LEAN (+20 % or more).

S When COOLANT TEMP in the freeze frame data is less than 80°C (176°F), there is a possibility of
misfire only during engine warm-up.

S If the misfire cannot be reproduced, the following reasons may apply: 1) the vehicle has low fuel, 2)
improper fuel is being used, and 3) the ignition plug is contaminated.

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)
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S Be sure to check the value on the misfire counter after the repair.

1 | Are there any other codes (besides DTC P0300, P0301, P0302, P0303, P0304
P0305, P0306, P0307 or P0308) being output?

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand—-held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /
CURRENT CODES.

CHECK:

Read the DTC using hand—held tester.

RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to

"P0300, P0301, P0302, P0303, P0304, P0305, P0306, P0O307 and/or
P0308”

A

"P0300, P0301, P0302, P0303, P0304, P0305, P0306, P0307 or
P0308" and other DTCs

HINT:
If any other codes besides "P0300, P0301, P0302, P0303, P0304, P0305, P0306, P0O307 or PO308" are
output, perform the troubleshooting for those DTC.

o

2 | Check wire harness, connector and vacuum hose in engine room.

B > Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI-19).

CHECK:
(@) Check the connection conditions of the wire harness and connector.
(b) Check for the disconnection, piping and brake of the vacuum hose.

NG Repair or replace, then confirm that there is no
misfire (See confirmation driving pattern).

OK

3 | Check connection of PCV piping.

NG> Repair or replace PCV piping.
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4 Connect hand-held tester, and read the number of misfire.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand—held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand-held tester main switch ON.

(c) Start the engine.

(d) When using hand-held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DATA LIST /
ALL / CYL#1 to CYL#8.

CHECK:

Read the number of misfire on the hand-held tester.

HINT:

When a misfire is not reproduced, be sure to branch below based on the stored DTC.

RESULT:

High Misfire Rate Cylinder Proceed to
1 or 2 cylinders A
More than 3 cylinders B

B > Go to step 15.

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)
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5 [ Check spark plug and spark of misfiring cylinder.

A19885

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

PREPARATION:

(@) Remove the ignition coil assembly.

(b) Remove the spark plug.

CHECK:

(@) Check the electrode for carbon deposits.

(b) Check the spark plug type.

(c) Check electrode gap.

OK:
No large carbon deposit present.
Not wet with gasoline or oil.
Electrode gap:

Type Specified Condition
DENSO d SK20R11 1.0to 1.3 mm
made -
(0.039 to 0.050 in.)
NGK d IFR6A1L 1.0to 1.3 mm
made .
(0.039 to 0.050 in.)
DENSO made* K20R-U 0.7to 1.0 mm
(0.027 to 0.039 in.)
0.7to 1.0 mm
NGK made* BKRBEYA

(0.027 to 0.039 in.)

*. Australia spec only
NOTICE:
If adjusting the gap of a new spark plug, bend only "the
base / ground” electrode. Do not touch the tip. Never at-
tempt to adjust the gap on a used plug.
PREPARATION:
(@) Install the spark plug to the ignition coil assembly.
(b) Disconnect the injector connector.
(c) Ground spark plug.
CHECK:
Check if spark occurs while engine is being cracked.
CAUTION:
Always disconnect each injector connector.
NOTICE:
Do not crank the engine for more than 2 seconds.
OK:
Spark occurs across electrode gap.

OK> Go to step 8.
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6 [ Change normal spark plug and check spark of misfiring cylinder.

PREPARATION:
(&) Change to the normal spark plug.
(1) Remove the spark plug that may be faulty from the
ignition coil assembly.
(2) Install the spark plug to the ignition coil assembly.
(b) Disconnect the injector connector.
(c) Ground the spark plug.
CHECK:
aosss|  Check if spark occurs while the engine is being cranked.
CAUTION:
Always disconnect each injector connector.
NOTICE:
Do not crank the engine for more than 2 seconds.
OK:
Spark jumps across electrode gap.

N ° A19431

OK> Replace spark plug.
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7 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition coil and

engine control ECU.

Wire Harness Side:

Check the harness and connector between the ignition coil
and the engine control ECU (IGF terminal) connectors:

Ignition Coil Connector PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnectthell, 12,13, 14,15, 16, I7 or I8 ignition coil con-
nector.
(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
@ CHECK:
Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
Y A21025 tors.
OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition
i T A T Ignition coil (11-2) - IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
@ H i_i_i : i ma i i | i i H i i }} Ignition coil (12-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (13-2) — IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (14-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
‘ i i 7 : : : : : ! IGE2 Ignition coil (I5-2) - IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
Engine Control ECU Ignition coil (16-2) — IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q
y IGF1 Connector ro1023 Ignition coil (I7-2) - IGF1 (E7-24) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (18-2) - IGF2 (E7-23) Below 1 Q

Ignition coil (11-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (12-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (13-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (14-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (15-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (16-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (17-2) or IGF1 (E7-24) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Ignition coil (18-2) or IGF2 (E7-23) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher
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DI-140

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE
Wire Hamess Side Check the harness and connector between the ignition coil
| 1ae: . .
and the engine control ECU (IGT terminal) connectors:
|gniti0n Coil Connector PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnectthell, 12,13, 14,15, 16, I7 or I8 ignition coil con-
nector.
(b) Disconnect the E7 engine control ECU connector.
D@ CHECK:
Check the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
Y A21025 tors.
OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition
= IITII : [—I g f—— Ignition coil (11-3) - IGT1 (E7-9) Below 1 Q
@ _i_i""'HH T Ignition coil (12-3) - IGT2 (E7-8) Below 1 Q
‘ ' Ignition coil (13-3) - IGT3 (E7-25) Below 1 Q
IGT7] Ignition coil (14-3) - IGT4 (E7-11) Below 1 Q
IGT2 . )
o IGT1 Ignition coil (15-3) - IGT5 (E7-12) Below 1 Q
IGT6 |IGT8 Engine Control ECU Ignition coil (16-3) — IGT6 (E7-26) Below 1 Q
y IGT3 IGTS Connector 721023 Ignition coil (I7-3) - IGT7 (E7-13) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (18-3) - IGT8 (E7-10) Below 1 Q
Ignition coil (11-3) or IGT1 (E7-9) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (12-3) or IGT2 (E7-8) - .
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (13-3) or IGT3 (E7-25) - .
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (14-3) or IGT4 (E7-11) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (15-3) or IGT5 (E7-12) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (16-3) or IGT6 (E7-26) — .
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (I7-3) or IGT7 (E7-13) - .
10 k< or higher
Body ground
Ignition coil (18-3) or IGT8 (E7-10) - )
10 k< or higher
Body ground
OK Replace ignition coil with igniter, then confirm
that there is no misfire.

NG

Repair or replace harness or connector.
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8 [ Check engine control ECU terminal of misfiring cylinder.

#2(+) #6(+)
#3 (+) #1(+) #7(+)
#8(+)

AL NG AT 2 AR
i ke |
NHH) H H H)

ES E9

EO1 (=) #5(+) Engine Control ECU

P A19522 Connector A19630

F
|
=

NG

PREPARATION:

Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure the voltage between the terminals of the E7, E8 and
E9 engine control ECU connectors.

OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition
#1 (E7-1) - EO1 (E7-7) 9t0 14V
#2 (E7-2) - EO1 (E7-7) 9t0 14V
#3 (E7-3) - E01 (E7-7) 9t0 14V
#4 (E7-4) - EO1 (E7-7) 9t0 14V
#5 (E7-5) - EO1 (E7-7) 9to0 14V
#6 (E8-3) - EO1 (E7-7) 910 14V
#7 (E9-6) - EO1 (E7-7) 9t0 14V
#8 (E9-5) - EOL (E7-7) 9to0 14V
OK> Go to step 11.

Fl-24).

9 [ Check injector resistance of misfiring cylinder (See Pub. No. RM630E, page

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

NG> Replace injector.
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10

Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition SW and in-
jector, injector and engine control ECU of misfiring cylinder.

Wire Harness Side:

O

Injector Connector

A21343

#4

C

#3 Engine Control ECU Connector ,,,344

Wire Harness Side:

Ignit

ion Switch Connector

1G2

A21345

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

Check the harness and the connector between the injector
connector and the engine control ECU connector:
PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnectthe 110, 111,112,113, 114, 115116 or 117 injec-
tor connector.
(b) Disconnectthe E7, E8 or E9 engine control ECU connec-
tor.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:
Tester Connection Specified Condition
Injector (110-2) — #1 (E7-1) Below 1 Q
Injector (111-2) — #2 (E7-2) Below 1 Q
Injector (112-2) - #3 (E7-3) Below 1 Q
Injector (113-2) — #4 (E7-4) Below 1 Q
Injector (114-2) — #5 (E7-5) Below 1 Q
Injector (115-2) — #6 (E8-3) Below 1 Q
Injector (116-2) — #7 (E9-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (117-2) — #8 (E9-5) Below 1 Q

Injector (110-2) or #1 (E7-1) -

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Injector (111-2) or #2 (E7-2) —

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Injector (112-2) or #3 (E7-3) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Injector (113-2) or #4 (E7-4) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Injector (114-2) or #5 (E7-5) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher

Injector (115-2) or #6 (E8-3) —

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Injector (116-2) or #7 (E9-6) —

10 kQ or high
Body ground 0 orhigner

Injector (117-2) or #8 (E9-5) -

Body ground 10 k< or higher
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OK
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Check the harness and connector between the injector

connector and the ignition switch:

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnectthe110,111,112,113, 114,115, 116 or 117 injec-

tor connector.

(b) Disconnect the 126 ignition switch connector.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-

tors.

OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

Injector (110-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (111-1) — 1G2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (112-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (113-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (114-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (115-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (116-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q
Injector (117-1) - IG2 (126-6) Below 1 Q

Injector (110-1) or 1G2 (126-6) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (111-1) or IG2 (126-6) —
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (112-1) or IG2 (126-6) —
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (113-1) or IG2 (126-6) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (114-1) or 1G2 (126-6) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (115-1) or IG2 (126-6) —
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (116-1) or IG2 (126-6) —
Body ground

10 k< or higher

Injector (117-1) or 1G2 (126-6) -
Body ground

10 k< or higher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.
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11 | Check injector injection of misfiring cylinder (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-29).

@

)

Replace injector.

EM-3).

12 | Check compression pressure of misfiring cylinder (See Pub. No. RM630E, page

3

o )

Repair or replace.

13 | Check valve clearance of misfiring cylinder (See Pub. No. RM630E, page EM-6).

3

o )

Adjust valve clearance.

14 | Check result of step 4 switch step by number of misfire cylinder.

High misfire rate cylinder

Proceed to

1 or 2 cylinders

A

More than 3 cylinders

B

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)

)

Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-3).
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15

Check valve timing (Check for looseness or a jumped tooth of timing belt)

(See Pub. No. RM630E, page EM-14).

NG>

Adjust valve timing (Repair or replace timing
belt).

3

16

Check fuel pressure (See Pub. No. RM630E, page FI-1).

-

Check and repair fuel pump, pressure regulator,
fuel pipe line and filter (See Pub. No. RM630E,
page FI-7).

2UZ-FE ENGINE SUP (RM1113E)
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17 | Check intake air temperature and air flow rate.

PREPARATION:

(@) Connect the hand—held tester to the DLC3.

(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Check the intake air temperature.
(1) Select the item "DIAGNOSIS/OBD/MOBD/DATA LIST/ALL/INTAKE AIR”.
(2) Read its value displayed on the hand-held tester.

OK.:

Equivalent to ambient temperature
CHECK:
Check the air flow rate.
(1) Select the item "DIAGNOSIS/OBD/MOBD/DATA LIST/ALL/MAF”.
(2) Read its value displayed on the hand-held tester.

OK:
Condition Air Flow Rate (gm/s)
Ignition switch ON (do not start engine) 0
Idling 4106
Running without load (2,500 rpm) 13to 20
Idling to quickly accelerating Air flow rate fluctuates

NG> Replace air flow meter.
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18 | Check engine coolant temperature sensor.

Ohmmeter

RESISTANCE KQ
N WOl

o
a

0.1t

L 1 1 1 1 Il )

-20 0 20 40 60 80 100
Sot166 (-4) (32) (68) (104)(140) (176) (212)

sotees TEMPERATURE _C (_F) A21042

OK

PREPARATION:

Remove the engine coolant temperature sensor.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between the terminals of the engine
coolant temperature sensor.

Resistance:
Tester Connection Specified Condition
2.32 t0 2.59 kQ (20_C (68_F))
1-2 0.310 to 0.326 k€ (80_C (176_F))
NOTICE:

In case of checking the engine coolant temperature sensor
in the water, be careful not to allow water to go into the ter-
minals. After checking, dry the sensor.

HINT:

Alternate procedure: Connect an ohmmeter to the installed en-
gine coolant temperature sensor and read the resistance. Use
an infrared thermometer to measure the engine temperature in
the immediate vicinity of the sensor. Compare these values to
the resistance/temperature graph. Change the engine temper-
ature (warm up or allow to cool down) and repeat the test.

NG> Replace engine coolant temperature sensor.

19 | Switch step by number of misfire cylinder (Refer result of step 4).

High misfire rate cylinder

Proceed to

1 or 2 cylinders

A

More than 3 cylinders

B

B > Go to step 5.

Check for intermittent problems
(See page DI-3).
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